Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.565

Office of renewable fuels—Established.

(1) The statewide office of renewable fuels is established within the department. The office shall report to the director of the department. The office may employ staff as necessary to carry out the office's duties as prescribed by chapter 292, Laws of 2022, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose.

(2) The purpose of the office is to leverage, support, and integrate with other state agencies to:

(a) Accelerate comprehensive market development with assistance along the entire life cycle of renewable fuel projects;

(b) Support research into and development and deployment of renewable fuel and the production, distribution, and use of renewable and green electrolytic hydrogen and their derivatives, as well as product engineering and manufacturing relating to the production and use of such hydrogen and its derivatives;

(c) Drive job creation, improve economic vitality, and support the transition to clean energy;

(d) Further the development and use of alternative jet fuels as a productive industry in Washington;

(e) Enhance resiliency by using renewable fuels, alternative jet fuels, and green electrolytic hydrogen to support climate change mitigation and adaptations; and

(f) Partner with overburdened communities to ensure communities equitably benefit from renewable and clean fuels efforts.

[ 2023 c 232 s 5; 2022 c 292 s 102.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 232 ss 1-7: See note following RCW 70A.535.010.

Automatic expiration date exemption—2023 c 232: See note following RCW 82.04.287.

Intent—2023 c 232: See note following RCW 70A.535.010.

Findings—Intent—2022 c 292: "(1) The legislature finds that while hydrogen fuel has been used in a variety of applications in the state, the source of hydrogen has been derived from fossil fuel feedstocks, such as natural gas. Hydrogen is an essential building block and energy carrier molecule that is necessary in the production of conventional and renewable fuels and a valuable decarbonization tool when used in sectors such as marine, aviation, steel, aluminum, and cement, as well as surface transportation including heavy duty vehicles, such as transit, trucking, and drayage equipment. Hydrogen can be a carbon-free fuel with an energy per unit mass that is three to four times greater than jet fuel, whose energy can be extracted either through thermochemical (combustion) or electrochemical (fuel cell) processes. In both cases, the only by-product is water, instead of the greenhouse gases and other conventional and toxic pollutants that are emitted from using fossil fuels.

(2) The legislature further finds that the use of renewable hydrogen and hydrogen produced from carbon-free feedstocks through electrolysis is an essential tool to a clean energy ecosystem and emissions reduction for challenging infrastructure needs. Clean hydrogen fuel can be produced or "charged" closer to the generation of the electricity when the electrical supply grid has surplus energy, at times of low electricity use, such as evenings, then made available at times of higher need and convenient locations, such as fueling stations, avoiding the need to build or upgrade larger electrical infrastructure, including distribution systems, to meet higher peak demand for electricity.

(3) Therefore, the legislature intends by this act to establish policies and a framework for the state to become a national and global leader in the production and use of these hydrogen fuels. This act will create an office of renewable fuels to: Promote partnerships among industrial, transportation, agriculture, and commercial interests as well as fuel producers, the technology research sector, and public sector agencies; identify barriers to and opportunities for market development; provide greater clarity and certainty in regulatory and siting standards; provide incentives and financial assistance in the deployment of hydrogen fuel infrastructure; support a clean and just energy transition; help create good quality, clean energy jobs; and improve air quality in degraded areas, particularly in communities that have borne disproportionate levels of air pollution from the combustion of fossil fuels." [ 2022 c 292 s 1.]